Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.285

State treasurer receiving agent of certain federal aid—Trust funds not subject to appropriation.

All federal grants received by the state treasurer pursuant to RCW 28B.30.270 shall be deemed trust funds under the control of the state treasurer and not subject to appropriation by the legislature.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.285. Prior: 1955 c 66 s 4. Formerly RCW 28.80.224.]